Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2667.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4908(a) of Title 73 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4908. Tax levies.(a) General rule.--The board of commissioners may levy taxes by resolution for taxes levied at the same rate as or a rate lower than the previous fiscal year, and by ordinance if the tax rate increases from the previous fiscal year. Taxes may be levied upon all property and occupations within the township made taxable for township purposes and subject to valuation and assessment by the county assessment office, for the following purposes and at the following rates:* * *(10) An annual tax, not to exceed three mills, for the support of the township's police department, only following a 12345678910111213141516171819 favorable referendum on the matter held in accordance with the election laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2667PN3702 - 2 - 1234